Arkansas, session 2025, SB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION SENATE EXPENSES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable from the Constitutional
Officers Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
(A) for Mileage Allowances, Per diem, Maintenance and General
Operations and other expenses authorized by law, the sum of ........$675,000.
(B) for Salaries of Employees, in a sum not to exceed ........$650,000.
(C) for Employer Matching Funds, in a sum not to exceed .......$75,000.

SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER.
If the Senate Efficiency Committee and the Secretary of the Senate, subject
to approval by the Arkansas Senate, should determine that any item or portion
thereof appropriated herein for a specific purpose is not needed for such
*JAR010*
01/07/2025 2:16:05 PM JAR010

SB1
purpose, the Secretary of the Senate may certify such fact to the State
Auditor and the State Auditor shall cause a transfer to be made from one item
to another.

SECTION 3. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly that the Arkansas Senate of the 95th General Assembly
convenes in Regular Session on January 13, 2025; that expenses of the session
begin immediately; and that the expenses are a just expense of the state
which much be paid at the time services are provided. Therefore, an
emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in
full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.
If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become
effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor
may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides
the veto.
01/07/2025 2:16:05 PM JAR010